Washington statutes.
RCW 10.79.110

Strip, body cavity searches—Actions for damages, injunctive relief.

(1) A person who suffers damage or harm as a result of a violation of RCW 10.79.080, 10.79.090, 10.79.100, or 10.79.130 through 10.79.170 may bring a civil action to recover actual damages sustained by him or her. The court may, in its discretion, award injunctive and declaratory relief as it deems necessary.

(2) RCW 10.79.080, 10.79.090, 10.79.100, and 10.79.130 through 10.79.170 shall not be construed as limiting any constitutional, common law, or statutory right of any person regarding any action for damages or injunctive relief, or as precluding the prosecution under another provision of law of any law enforcement officer or other person who has violated RCW 10.79.080, 10.79.090, 10.79.100, or 10.79.130 through 10.79.170.

[ 1986 c 88 s 7; 1983 1st ex.s. c 42 s 6.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Severability—1983 1st ex.s. c 42: See notes following RCW 10.79.060.